src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Humsubj-VerbRoot   !!= * **@CODE@**
bissánit:bissán LASSAN_IV ;
báhtarit:báhtar SUOTNJAL_IV ;
ceagganit:ceaggan LASSAN_IV ;
vierralit:vierral SUOTNJAL_IV ;
gaikánit:gajkán LASSAN_IV ;
gavccádit:gavccád BEAGASJ_IV ;
skielgguhit:skielgguh BALAT_IV ;
gizzulit:gizzul SUOTNJAL_IV ;
hedjonit:hedjon LASSAN_IV ;
irgalit:irgal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
lahkanit:lahkan LAHKAN_TV ;
lahkonit:lahkon LAHKAN_TV ;
lahkonit+Err/Orth-a-á:láhkon LAHKAN_TV ;
lassánit+Err/Orth-a-á:lássan LASSAN_IV ;
lihkkasit:lihkkas BOTNJAS_IV ;
láhttestit:láhttest GEAGAT_TV ;
manadit:manad BALAT_IV ;
maŋŋánit:maŋŋán LASSAN_IV ;
máraidit:máraj HURAI_IV ;
njáhkalit:njáhkal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
nuoskidit:nuoskid NUOSKIT_IV ;
oahpahit:oahpah OAHPAHIT_TV ;
oahpahit+Err/Orth:oahpa OAHPAHIT_TV ;
oktiibeaškkihit:oktii#beaškkih BEAGASJ_IV ;
suhtadit:suhtad BALAT_IV ;
suorganit+Err/Orth-a-á:suorgán LASSAN_IV ;
vuolgalit:vuolgal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
čoahkkanit+Err/Orth:čohkkan LASSAN_IV ;
čohkiidit:čohkijd JORGGIID_IV ;
čulkkihit:čulkkih BEAGASJ_IV ;
hurrulit:hurrul SUOTNJAL_IV ;
bilaidit:bilaj HURAI_IV ;
jieppadit:jieppad BALAT_IV ;
nallasit:nallas BOTNJAS_IV ;
oahpásmit:oahpásm JORGGIID_IV ;
arggosmit:arggosm JORGGIID_IV ;
geamppasmit:geamppasm JORGGIID_IV ;
moskkosmit:moskkosm JORGGIID_IV ;
vuogasmit:vuogasm JORGGIID_IV ;
hievganit:hievgan LASSAN_IV ;
háikkádit:hájkkád BEAGASJ_IV ;
LEXICON 3-VerbRoot
bohciidit+Err/Orth:bohcid JORGGIID_IV ;
bahraidit:bahraj HURAI_IV ;
beahkilit:beahkil SUOTNJAL_IV ;
beađđasit:beađđas BOTNJAS_IV ;
bievlladit+Err/Orth:pievllad BALAT_IV ; !
boatkanit:boatkan LASSAN_IV ;
buljihit:buljih BEAGASJ_IV ;
buovadit:buovad GEAGAT_TV ;
buovvalit:buovval BUOVVAL_TV ;
báfaidit:báfaj HURAI_IV ;
báitilit:bájtil SUOTNJAL_IV ;
báttástit:báttást GEAGAT_TV ;
caggasit:caggas BOTNJAS_IV ;
ceaggádit:ceaggád BALAT_IV ;
cilaidit:cilaj HURAI_IV ;
civzziidit:civzzijd JORGGIID_IV ;
cuvkkádit:cuvkkád BEAGASJ_IV ;
deamaidit:deamaj HURAI_IV ;
doadjásit:doadjás BOTNJAS_IV ;
duoldalit:duoldal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
dáraidit:dáraj HURAI_IV ;
dássánit:dássán LASSAN_IV ;
gaikodit:gajkod BALAT_IV ;
gavvásit:gavvás BOTNJAS_IV ;
geagadit:geagad GEAGAT_TV ;
geagihit:geagih GEAGAT_TV ;
geavránit:geavrán BEAGASJ_IV ;
gomaidit:gomaj HURAI_IV ;
gopmulit:gopmul SUOTNJAL_IV ;
gosadit:gosad BALAT_IV ;
goskkiidit:goskkijd JORGGIID_IV ;
goŋggihit:goŋggih BEAGASJ_IV ;
guoigalit:guojgal BUOVVAL_TV ;
gákcánit:gákcán LASSAN_IV ;
gávvasit:gávvas BOTNJAS_IV ;
haraidit:haraj HURAI_IV ;
huvlliidit:huvllijd JORGGIID_IV ;
hálihit:hálih HALIHIT_TV ;
hálkkihit:hálkkih BEAGASJ_IV ;
jamaidit:jamaj HURAI_IV ;
jađgodit:jađgod BALAT_IV ;
konstošit:konstoš BEAGASJ_IV ;
laktásit+Err/Orth-a-á:láktas BOTNJAS_IV ; !
loakkagit:loakkag JORGGIID_IV ;
lunjaidit:lunjaj HURAI_IV ;
luotkanit:luotkan LASSAN_IV ;
láttadit:láttad BALAT_IV ;
meađaldit:meađald BEAGASJ_IV ;
moarrasit:moarras BOTNJAS_IV ;
moađgalit:moađgal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
niibbástit:nijbbást GEAGAT_TV ;
njattiidit:njattijd JORGGIID_IV ;
njavgguhit:njavgguh BALAT_IV ;
njaŋgasit:njaŋgas BOTNJAS_IV ;
njáŋgasit:njáŋgas BOTNJAS_IV ;
nogihit:nogih BEAGASJ_IV ;
oahkulit:oahkul SUOTNJAL_IV ;
ovttaidit:ovttaj HURAI_IV ;
reavžžagit:reavžžag JORGGIID_IV ;
reavžžuhit:reavžžuh BALAT_IV ;
rohttásit:rohttás BOTNJAS_IV ;
ruovddástit:ruovddást GEAGAT_TV ;
ruovssildit:ruovssild BEAGASJ_IV ;
ruvgánit:ruvgán LASSAN_IV ;
sahkiidit:sahkijd JORGGIID_IV ;
skilaidit:skilaj HURAI_IV ;
skoalkkihit:skoalkkih BEAGASJ_IV ;
skuolffuhit:skuolffuh BALAT_IV ;
skužaidit:skužaj HURAI_IV ;
snarragit:snarrag JORGGIID_IV ;
soappástit:soappást GEAGAT_TV ;
spaigasit:spajgas BOTNJAS_IV ;
spáikkihit:spájkkih BEAGASJ_IV ;
stužaidit:stužaj HURAI_IV ;
stáippuhit:stájppuh BALAT_IV ;
sággalit:sággal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
sáittástit:sájttást GEAGAT_TV ;
vealččihit:vealččih BEAGASJ_IV ;
veanzasit:veanzas BOTNJAS_IV ;
vielgánit:vielgán LASSAN_IV ;
čahrralit:čahrral SUOTNJAL_IV ;
čeaskkuhit:čeaskkuh BALAT_IV ;
čerggiidit:čerggijd JORGGIID_IV ;
čiŋkulit:čiŋkul SUOTNJAL_IV ;
šleaŋgasit:šleaŋgas BOTNJAS_IV ;
šnjalččuhit:šnjalččuh BALAT_IV ;
čoahraidit:čoahraj HURAI_IV ;
šoažuhit:šoažuh BEAGASJ_IV ;
čuoldásit:čuoldás BOTNJAS_IV ;
